Utah statutes.
34A-2-506.   Loss of hearing -- Time for filing claim.

An employee's occupational hearing loss shall be reported to the employer pursuant to Section 34A-2-407 within 180 days of the date the employee:

(1)  first suffered altered hearing; and

(2)  knew, or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known, that the hearing loss was caused by employment.

